Washington statutes.
RCW 18.47.040

Birth doula without certification—Permitted.

(1) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a person from practicing as a birth doula without obtaining certification under this chapter.

(2) No person may use the title "state-certified birth doula" in connection with the person's name to indicate or imply, directly or indirectly, that the person is a state-certified birth doula without being certified in accordance with this chapter as a birth doula.

[ 2022 c 217 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 217 ss 1-5: See note following RCW 18.47.010.